New York, session 2025-2026, A9410.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph b of section 21.00 of the local finance law, as 2 amended by chapter 167 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 b. Serial bonds shall mature in annual installments. The first 5 installment shall mature not later than [eighteen months after the date 6 of such bonds or two years after the date of the first bond anticipation 7 note or notes issued in anticipation of such bonds, whichever is the 8 earlier, provided, however, that until July fifteenth, two thousand 9 twenty-seven, the first installment shall mature not later than] two 10 years after the date of such bonds or two years after the date of the 11 first bond anticipation note or notes issued in anticipation of such 12 bonds, whichever is the earlier. However, if bond anticipation notes are 13 issued in anticipation of bonds and if a portion of such notes or the 14 renewals thereof are redeemed from a source other than the proceeds of 15 such bonds within two years from the date of the first such note or 16 notes and a further portion thereof shall be so redeemed prior to the 17 termination of each twelve months' period succeeding the date such 18 original portion was so redeemed, the first installment of such bonds 19 may, in the alternative, be made to mature not later than five years 20 from the date of the first such note or notes. 21 § 2. Paragraph b of section 53.00 of the local finance law, as amended 22 by chapter 167 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 23 b. If such bonds or notes are payable in installments, the install- 24 ments remaining unpaid may be called for redemption [only (i) in the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00872-01-5 A. 9410 2 1 inverse order of their maturity or, (ii) in equal proportionate amounts; 2 provided, however, that for bonds issued during the one-year period 3 commencing July first, nineteen hundred eighty-eight, and for bonds 4 issued during the one-year period commencing July first, nineteen 5 hundred eighty-nine, and for bonds issued during the one-year period 6 commencing July first, nineteen hundred ninety, and for bonds issued 7 during the three-year period commencing July first, nineteen hundred 8 ninety-one, and for bonds issued during the period from July first, 9 nineteen hundred ninety-four up until and including July fifteenth, 10 nineteen hundred ninety-seven and for bonds issued during the period 11 from July fifteenth, nineteen hundred ninety-seven up until and includ- 12 ing July fifteenth, two thousand, and for bonds issued during the period 13 from July fifteenth, two thousand up until and including July fifteenth, 14 two thousand three, and for bonds issued during the period from July 15 fifteenth, two thousand three up until and including July fifteenth, two 16 thousand six, and for bonds issued during the period from July 17 fifteenth, two thousand six up until and including July fifteenth, two 18 thousand nine, and for bonds issued during the period from July 19 fifteenth, two thousand six up until and including July fifteenth, two 20 thousand twelve, and for bonds issued during the period from July 21 fifteenth, two thousand nine up until and including July fifteenth, two 22 thousand fifteen, and for bonds issued during the period from July 23 fifteenth, two thousand fifteen up until and including July fifteenth, 24 two thousand eighteen, and for bonds issued during the period from July 25 fifteenth, two thousand eighteen up until and including July fifteenth, 26 two thousand twenty-one, and for bonds issued during the period from 27 July fifteenth, two thousand twenty-one up until and including July 28 fifteenth, two thousand twenty-four, and for bonds issued during the 29 period from July fifteenth, two thousand twenty-four up until and 30 including July fifteenth, two thousand twenty-seven, installments 31 remaining unpaid on such bonds may be called for redemption] prior to 32 their date of maturity in such amounts, at such times in such manner and 33 pursuant to such terms as may be determined by the finance board of a 34 municipality, school district or district corporation at the time of the 35 issuance thereof. Whenever any bonds or notes are called for redemption 36 prior to the date of their maturity, interest shall cease to be paid 37 thereon after the date for redemption set forth in such call for redemp- 38 tion. [The sum to be paid to redeem any unpaid installment prior to its 39 maturity, exclusive of the interest accruing on such installment to the 40 date of redemption, shall in no event be in excess of the lesser amount 41 of either (i) the par value of such installment plus one-half of one per 42 centum of such par value for each calendar year or part thereof elapsing 43 between the date for redemption set forth in such call for redemption 44 and the date of maturity of such installment, provided, however, that 45 such amount shall not exceed one hundred five per centum of such par 46 value, or (ii) the par value of such installment plus the total of all 47 unpaid interest on such installment which would have accrued from the 48 date of redemption to the date of maturity thereof had such installment 49 not been redeemed prior to maturity, except that bonds sold to the state 50 of New York municipal bond bank agency, which are subject to call as 51 hereinbefore authorized, may provide for the payment of a redemption 52 premium not to exceed five per centum of the par value of the bonds to 53 be called, payable on the date of the redemption thereof; provided, 54 however, that for bonds issued during the one-year period commencing 55 July first, nineteen hundred eighty-eight, and for bonds issued during 56 the one-year period commencing July first, nineteen hundred eighty-nine, A. 9410 3 1 and for bonds issued during the one-year period commencing July first, 2 nineteen hundred ninety, and for bonds issued during the three-year 3 period commencing July first, nineteen hundred ninety-one, and for bonds 4 issued during the period from July first, nineteen hundred ninety-four 5 up until and including July fifteenth, nineteen hundred ninety-seven, 6 and for bonds issued during the period from July fifteenth, nineteen 7 hundred ninety-seven up until and including July fifteenth, two thou- 8 sand, and for bonds issued during the period from July fifteenth, two 9 thousand up until and including July fifteenth, two thousand three, and 10 for bonds issued during the period from July fifteenth, two thousand 11 three up until and including July fifteenth, two thousand six, and for 12 bonds issued during the period from July fifteenth, two thousand six up 13 until and including July fifteenth, two thousand nine, and for bonds 14 issued during the period from July fifteenth, two thousand nine up until 15 and including July fifteenth, two thousand twelve, and for bonds issued 16 during the period from July fifteenth, two thousand twelve up until and 17 including July fifteenth, two thousand fifteen, and for bonds issued 18 during the period from July fifteenth, two thousand fifteen up until and 19 including July fifteenth, two thousand eighteen, and for bonds issued 20 during the period from July fifteenth, two thousand eighteen up until 21 and including July fifteenth, two thousand twenty-one, and for bonds 22 issued during the period from July fifteenth, two thousand twenty-one up 23 until and including July fifteenth, two thousand twenty-four, and for 24 bonds issued during the period from July fifteenth, two thousand twen- 25 ty-four up until and including July fifteenth, two thousand twenty-sev- 26 en, a] A municipality, school district, or district corporation may 27 provide for redemption of such bonds prior to the date of their maturity 28 at a price or prices as may be as determined by the issuer of such bonds 29 or notes at the time of the issuance thereof. 30 § 3. Section 107.00 of the local finance law is REPEALED. 31 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.